Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1625
Owner, defined.

Owner includes any of the following who or which owns, controls, manages, or proposes to construct, reconstruct, enlarge, alter, breach, remove, or abandon a dam:

(1) The United States Government and its departments, agencies, and bureaus;

(2) The state and its departments, institutions, agencies, and political subdivisions;

(3) A municipal or quasi-municipal corporation;

(4) A public utility;

(5) A district;

(6) A person;

(7) A duly authorized agent, lessee, or trustee of any person or entity listed in this section; and

(8) A receiver or trustee appointed by a court for any person or entity listed in this section.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 25.